tr: Banknot muhafaza tipi: Kapsüllü / muhafazalı; Albüm sayfasında; Orijinal paketinde; Sunum dosyasında; Kılıfında; Açık (sertifikasız); Diğer
hu: Bankjegytartó típusa: Tokozott; Albumban; Eredeti csomagolásban; Díszcsomagolásban; Fóliában; Nyers (nem tanúsított); Egyéb
es: Tipo de portabilletes: Encapsulado/en slab; En página de álbum; En paquete original; En carpeta de presentación; En funda; En bruto (sin certificar); Otro
cs: Typ obalu/pouzdra na bankovky: Zapouzdřená (slab); V albovém listu; V původním balení; V dárkových deskách; V pouzdře; Neuzavřená (necertifikovaná); Jiné
sv: Sedelhållartyp: Inkapslad/slabbad; I albumsida; I originalförpackning; I presentationsmapp; I ficka; Rå (ocertifierad); Övrigt
zh-CN: 纸币保存盒类型: 封装/装盒; 册页装; 原装; 礼品册装; 保护套袋装; 裸币（未认证）; 其他
de: Typ des Banknotenhalters: Eingekapselt / Slab; In Albumseite; In Originalverpackung; In Präsentationsmappe; In Schutzhülle; Lose (nicht zertifiziert); Sonstige
da: Type af pengeseddelholder: Indkapslet/slabbed; I albumside; I original emballage; I præsentationsmappe; I lomme; Rå (ucertificeret); Andet
ja: 紙幣ホルダータイプ: カプセル / スラブ入り; アルバムページ入り; オリジナルパック入り; プレゼンテーションフォルダー入り; スリーブ入り; 裸 (未鑑定); その他
en: Banknote holder type: Encapsulated / slabbed; In album page; In original pack; In presentation folder; In sleeve; Raw (uncertified); Other
vi: Loại hộp đựng tiền giấy: Đóng hộp nhựa cứng / Slab; Trong trang album; Trong gói nguyên bản; Trong bìa kẹp trình bày; Trong bao vỏ; Nguyên bản (chưa chứng nhận); Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta držala za bankovce: V kapsuli; Na strani albuma; V originalnem pakiranju; V predstavitveni mapi; V zaščitnem ovitku; Prosto (necertificirano); Drugo
ro-RO: Tipul suportului bancnotei: Încapsulată / Slab; În pagină de album; În ambalajul original; În dosar de prezentare; În manșon; Brută (necertificată); Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de porta-notas: Encapsulada / Slab; Em folha de álbum; Na embalagem original; Em pasta de apresentação; Em envelope transparente; Avulsa (não certificada); Outro
th: ประเภทซอง/ที่เก็บธนบัตร: หุ้มในตลับเกรด; ในหน้าอัลบั้ม; ในแพ็คเกจดั้งเดิม; ในแฟ้มนำเสนอ; ในซองพลาสติก; ธนบัตรเปล่า (ไม่ผ่านการรับรอง); อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di detentore di banconote: Incapsulata / slabbed; Nella pagina dell'album; Nella confezione originale; Nella cartellina di presentazione; Nella bustina protettiva; Libera (non certificata); Altro
fr: Type d’étui pour billet de banque: Encapsulé / sous coque; En page d’album; Dans l’emballage d’origine; Dans un dossier de présentation; Sous pochette; Brut (non certifié); Autre
ru: Тип держателя банкноты: В капсуле / в слабе; На листе альбома; В оригинальной упаковке; В подарочном буклете; В холдере; Без холдера (не сертифицирована); Другое
ko: 지폐 홀더 유형: 캡슐화/슬랩 처리; 앨범 페이지 보관; 오리지널 팩 보관; 프레젠테이션 폴더 보관; 슬리브 보관; 원본(미인증); 기타
sk-SK: Typ držiaka bankoviek: V kapsule/slabe; Na albumovej strane; V pôvodnom balení; V prezentačnom obale; V puzdre; Voľná (necertifikovaná); Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta držača novčanica: Kapsulirano / slabirano; Na stranici albuma; U originalnom pakiranju; U prezentacijskoj mapi; U omotu; Bez omota (necertificirano); Ostalo
pl: Typ holdera banknotu: W kapslu / slabie; W klaserze; W oryginalnym opakowaniu; W folderze prezentacyjnym; W koszulce; Luzem (bez certyfikatu); Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de porta-notas: Encapsulada; Em página de álbum; Na embalagem original; Em pasta de apresentação; Em bolsa; Livre (não certificada); Outro
nl: Bankbiljet houder type: In capsule / slabbed; In albumpagina; In originele verpakking; In presentatiemap; In hoesje; Los (ongecertificeerd); Overig
lt-LT: Banknoto laikiklio tipas: Inkapsuliuota / plokštelėje; Albumo lape; Originalioje pakuotėje; Prezentaciniame aplanke; Įmautėje; Nepakuota (nesertifikuota); Kita
el: Τύπος θήκης τραπεζογραμματίου: Σε κάψουλα / πιστοποιημένη θήκη (slabbed); Σε σελίδα άλμπουμ; Στην αρχική συσκευασία; Σε φάκελο παρουσίασης; Σε θήκη; Σκέτο (χωρίς πιστοποίηση); Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип държач за банкноти: Капсулована / в слаб; В страница от албум; В оригинална опаковка; В презентационна папка; В джоб; Некапсулована (несертифицирана); Друго
fi: Setelin pidikkeen tyyppi: Kapseloitu/suojakoteloitu; Kansiosivulla; Alkuperäisessä pakkauksessa; Esittelykansiossa; Suojataskussa; Sertifioimaton; Muu
nb: Type seddelholder: Innkapslet/slabbet; I albumside; I originalemballasje; I presentasjonsmappe; I plastlomme; Rå (usertifisert); Annet
zh-TW: 紙幣保護盒類型: 密封盒裝; 收藏冊內頁; 原包裝; 展示夾; 保護套; 未封裝 (未認證); 其他